Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 1. Subject Matter and Definitions.

Sec. 45.14.101.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as Uniform Commercial Code — Funds Transfers.

History.

(§ 12 ch 34 SLA 1993)

Collateral references. —

Effect of Uniform Commercial Code article 4A on attachment, garnishment, forfeiture or other third-party process against fund transfers, 66 ALR6th 567.

Sec. 45.14.102.
Subject matter.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.14.108

, this chapter applies to funds transfers defined in AS

45.14.104

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 34 SLA 1993)

Collateral references. —

Effect of Uniform Commercial Code article 4A on attachment, garnishment, forfeiture or other third-party process against fund transfers, 66 ALR6th 567.

Sec. 45.14.103.
Payment order; definitions.

In this chapter,

“payment order” means an instruction of a sender to a receiving bank, transmitted orally, electronically, or in writing, to pay, or to cause another bank to pay, a fixed or determinable amount of money to a beneficiary if

the instruction does not state a condition to payment to the beneficiary other than time of payment;

the receiving bank is to be reimbursed by debiting an account of, or otherwise receiving payment from, the sender; and

the instruction is transmitted by the sender directly to the receiving bank or to an agent, funds-transfer system, or communication system for transmittal to the receiving bank;

“beneficiary” means the person to be paid by the beneficiary’s bank;

“beneficiary’s bank” means the bank that is identified in a payment order in which an account of the beneficiary is to be credited under an order, or that otherwise is to make payment to the beneficiary if the order does not provide for payment to an account;

“receiving bank” means the bank to which the sender’s instruction is addressed;

“sender” means the person giving the instruction to the receiving bank.

If an instruction complying with (a)(1) of this section is to make more than one payment to a beneficiary, the instruction is a separate payment order with respect to each payment.

A payment order is issued when it is sent to the receiving bank.

History.

(§ 12 ch 34 SLA 1993)

Sec. 45.14.104.
Funds transfer; definitions.

In this chapter,

“funds transfer” means the series of transactions, beginning with the originator’s payment order, made for the purpose of making payment to the beneficiary of the order; the term includes any payment order issued by the originator’s bank or an intermediary bank intended to carry out the originator’s payment order; a funds transfer is completed by acceptance by the beneficiary’s bank of a payment order for the benefit of the beneficiary of the originator’s payment order;

“intermediary bank” means a receiving bank other than the originator’s bank or the beneficiary’s bank;

“originator” means the sender of the first payment order in a funds transfer;

“originator’s bank” means

the receiving bank to which the payment order of the originator is issued if the originator is not a bank; or

the originator if the originator is a bank.

History.

(§ 12 ch 34 SLA 1993)

Sec. 45.14.105.
Other definitions.

In this chapter,

“authorized account” means a deposit account of a customer in a bank designated by the customer as a source of payment of payment orders issued by the customer to the bank; if a customer does not so designate an account, any account of the customer is an authorized account if payment of a payment order from that account is not inconsistent with a restriction on the use of that account;

“bank” means a person engaged in the business of banking and includes a savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, and trust company; a branch or separate office of a bank is a separate bank for purposes of this chapter;

“customer” means a person, including a bank, having an account with a bank or from whom a bank has agreed to receive payment orders;

“funds-transfer business day” of a receiving bank means the part of a day during which the receiving bank is open for the receipt, processing, and transmittal of payment orders and cancellations and amendments of payment orders;

“funds-transfer system” means a wire transfer network, automated clearinghouse, or other communication system of a clearinghouse or other association of banks through which a payment order by a bank may be transmitted to the bank to which the order is addressed;

[Repealed, § 113 ch 44 SLA 2009.]

“prove,” with respect to a fact, means to meet the burden of establishing the fact; “burden of establishing” has the meaning given in AS

45.01.211

.

Other definitions applying to this chapter and the sections in which they appear are

“acceptance” in AS

45.14.209

;

“executed” in AS

45.14.301

;

“execution date” in AS

45.14.301

;

“funds-transfer system rule” in AS

45.14.501

;

“payment by beneficiary’s bank to beneficiary” in AS

45.14.405

;

“payment by originator to beneficiary” in AS

45.14.406

;

“payment by sender to receiving bank” in AS

45.14.403

;

“payment date” in AS

45.14.401

;

“security procedure” in AS

45.14.201

.

The following definitions in AS

45.04.104

apply to this chapter:

“clearinghouse”;

“item”;

“suspends payments”.

In addition, AS 45.01 contains general definitions and principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout this chapter.

History.

(§ 12 ch 34 SLA 1993; am §§ 93, 113 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, repealed (a)(6), which read, “ ‘good faith’ means honesty in fact and the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing;”; in (a)(7), substituted “AS

45.01.211

” for “AS

45.01.201

”; made stylistic changes.

Collateral references. —

Reasonable commercial standards defense for banks under UCC § 3-419(3), 49 ALR4th 888.

Sec. 45.14.106.
Time payment order is received.

The time of receipt of a payment order or communication canceling or amending a payment order is determined by the rules applicable to receipt of a notice stated in AS

45.01.212

. A receiving bank may fix a cut-off time or times on a funds-transfer business day for the receipt and processing of payment orders and communications cancelling or amending payment orders. Different cut-off times may apply to payment orders, cancellations, or amendments, or to different categories of payment orders, cancellations, or amendments. A cut-off time may apply to senders generally, or different cut-off times may apply to different senders or categories of payment orders. If a payment order or communication cancelling or amending a payment order is received after the close of a funds-transfer business day or after the appropriate cut-off time on a funds-transfer business day, the receiving bank may treat the payment order or communication as received at the opening of the next funds-transfer business day.

If this chapter refers to an execution date or payment date or states a day on which a receiving bank is required to take action, and the date or day does not fall on a funds-transfer business day, the next day that is a funds-transfer business day is treated as the date or day stated, unless the contrary is stated in this chapter.

History.

(§ 12 ch 34 SLA 1993; am § 94 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (a), substituted “AS

45.01.212

” for “AS

45.01.201

(27)” in the first sentence; substituted “cancelling” for “canceling” twice in the subsection.

Sec. 45.14.107.
Federal reserve regulations and operating circulars.

Regulations of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System and operating circulars of the federal reserve banks supersede an inconsistent provision of this chapter to the extent of the inconsistency.

History.

(§ 12 ch 34 SLA 1993)

Sec. 45.14.108.
Relationship to federal law.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, this chapter does not apply to a funds transfer if a part of the funds transfer is governed by 15 U.S.C. 1693 — 1693r (Electronic Fund Transfer Act of 1978), as amended from time to time.

This chapter applies to a funds transfer that is a remittance transfer as defined in 15 U.S.C. 1693o-1, as amended from time to time, unless the remittance transfer is an electronic fund transfer as defined in 15 U.S.C. 1693a, as amended from time to time.

In a funds transfer to which this chapter applies, in the event of an inconsistency between an applicable provision of this chapter and an applicable provision of 15 U.S.C. 1693 — 1693r, the provision of 15 U.S.C. 1693 — 1693r governs to the extent of the inconsistency.

History.

(§ 12 ch 34 SLA 1993; am §§ 1, 2 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in (a), substituted “Except as provided in (b) of this section, this” for “This”, added “as amended from time to time” at the end; added (b) and (c).